Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-196
Odometers; retention of statement; violation; penalty.

Any transferor who does not retain a true copy of the odometer statement for a period of five years from the date of the transaction as required by section 60-192 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor. Any person who violates any other provision of sections 60-190 to 60-196 shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 96.